North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Bylaws.

§ 55A-10-20.
Amendment by directors.

If a corporation has no members entitled to vote thereon, its incorporators, until directors have been chosen, and thereafter its board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s bylaws subject to any approval required pursuant to

G.S. 55A-10-30

. The corporation shall provide at least five days’ written notice of any meeting of directors at which an amendment is to be voted upon. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider a proposed amendment to the bylaws and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment or state the general nature of the amendment. The amendment shall be approved by a majority of the directors in office at the time the amendment is adopted.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-10-21.
Amendment by directors and members.

If the corporation has members entitled to vote thereon, then, unless this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, bylaws, the members (acting pursuant to subsection (b) of this section), or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section) require a greater vote or voting by class, an amendment to a corporation’s bylaws to be adopted shall be approved:

By the board or in lieu thereof in writing by the number or proportion of members entitled under G.S. 55A-7-02(a) (2) to call a special meeting to consider such amendment;

By the members entitled to vote thereon by two-thirds of the votes cast or a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles of incorporation authorized by

G.S. 55A-10-30

.

The members entitled to vote thereon may condition the amendment’s adoption on its receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the board initiates an amendment to the bylaws or board approval is required by subsection (a) of this section to adopt an amendment to the bylaws, the board may condition the amendment’s adoption on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the board or the members seek to have the amendment approved by the members entitled to vote thereon at a membership meeting, the corporation shall give notice of the membership meeting to those members in accordance with

G.S. 55A-7-05

. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

If the board or the members seek to have the amendment approved by the members entitled to vote thereon by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2002-27, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section, which applies when a corporation has members entitled to vote on bylaw amendments, had no counterpart in the prior law and incorporates the procedures set forth in

G.S. 55A-10-03

for amendments to the articles of incorporation.

§ 55A-10-22.
Class voting by members on amendments.

The members of a class in a charitable or religious corporation are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the bylaws if the amendment would affect the rights of that class as to voting in a manner that is different from the manner in which such amendment would affect another class.

The members of a class in a corporation other than a charitable or religious corporation are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the bylaws if the amendment would:

Affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer of memberships in a manner that is different from the manner in which such amendment would affect another class;

Affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer of memberships by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of another class;

Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for that class;

Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class;

Effect an exchange, reclassification, or termination of all or part of the memberships of that class; or

Authorize a new class of memberships.

If a class is to be divided into two or more classes as a result of an amendment to the bylaws, the amendment shall be approved by the members of each class that would be created by the amendment.

If a class vote is required to approve an amendment to the bylaws, the amendment shall be approved by the members of the class by two-thirds of the votes cast by the class or a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the class on the amendment, whichever is less.

A class of members is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the articles of incorporation and bylaws provide that the class shall not vote on the proposed amendment.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Former Chapter 55A did not have class voting requirements such as those set forth in this section.

§§ 55A-10-23 through 55A-10-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.